fst/morphology/affixes/verb_prefixes.lexc
LEXICON VerbArgClass
@P.class.II@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.AI@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.TI@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.TA@ VerbOrder ;

LEXICON VerbOrder
@P.order.Ind@ IndependentPrefixes  ;
@P.order.Cnj@ ConjunctPreverbs ;
@P.order.Cond@ ConditionalPreverbs ;
@P.order.Imp@ LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON IndependentPrefixes
@D.class.II@@P.person.NI@0:@D.class.II@@P.person.NI@nit2 IndependentPrefixesBound ;
@D.class.II@@P.person.KI@0:@D.class.II@@P.person.KI@kit2 IndependentPrefixesBound ;
@P.person.NULL@ TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON IndependentPrefixesBound
0:%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON ConjunctPreverbs
PV/ê+:ê ConjunctPreverbsBound ;
PV/kâ+:kâ ConjunctPreverbsBound ;
PV/ta+:ta TensePreverbsBound ; !Check
PV/ka+:ka TensePreverbsBound ;
@P.err.Morph@ TensePreverbs ;
IC+:^IC LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON ConjunctPreverbsBound
0:-%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON ConditionalPreverbs
@P.conjunct.CC@IC+:@P.conjunct.CC@^IC LexicalPreverbGate ;
0 LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON TensePreverbs
0 LexicalPreverbGate ;
PV/kî+:kî TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/wî+:wî TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/kî+PV/wî+:kî-%<wî TensePreverbsBound ; !Check
@R.order.Ind@PV/ka+:@R.order.Ind@ka TensePreverbsBound ;

LEXICON TensePreverbsBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbGate
0 Reduplication ;
0 LexicalPreverbs ;
0 VerbStems ;

LEXICON Reduplication
RdplW+:d2ay2 ReduplicationBound ;
RdplS+:d2âh  ReduplicationBound ;
RdplW+RdplS+:d2ay2-%<d2âh ReduplicationBound ;
@P.err.Morph@RdplS+RdplW+:@P.err.Morph@d2âh-%<d2ay2 ReduplicationBound ;

LEXICON ReduplicationBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbs ;
0:-%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbs
PV/mino+:min1o LexicalPreverbsBound ;
@R.class.AI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.AI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@wî^COMt2 LexicalPreverbsBound ;
@R.class.TI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.TI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@wî^COMt2 LexicalPreverbsBound ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbsBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbGate ;

! LEXICON ComitativePreverb
! @D.class.AI@@P.comitative.NULL@ VerbStems ;
! @R.class.AI@@P.comitative.NULL@ VerbStems ;
! @R.class.AI@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.AI@@P.comitative.COM@wîci ComitativePreverbBound ;

! LEXICON ComitativePreverbBound
! 0:-%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON VerbStems
@R.class.II@ VII_Stems ;
@R.class.AI@ VAI_Stems ;
@R.class.TI@ VTI_Stems ;
@R.class.TA@ VTA_Stems ;
